District of Columbia statutes.
10-141

Rock Creek Park — Area.

The total area of lands finally to be acquired for said parkway shall not exceed the area and parcels described and delineated on map numbered 2, contained in House Document Numbered 1114 of the 64th Congress, First Session.

July 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 282, ch. 209, § 1
Mar. 4, 1921, 41 Stat. 1382, ch. 161, § 1
This section is referenced in § 10-154.
1981 Ed., § 8-141.
1973 Ed., § 8-147.